Tennessee statutes. Title 53 Food, Drugs And Cosmetics
Part 1

Health and Sanitation [Repealed]

53-8-101. [Repealed.]

Acts 1909, ch. 473, §§ 1, 2; 1913 (1st E.S.), ch. 15, § 1; Shan., §§ 3473a41, 3473a43; mod. Code 1932, §§ 6598, 6600; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 53-1001, 53-1002; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 5, effective April 17, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 53-8-101 — 53-8-117, concerned health and sanitation for establishments selling food.

53-8-102. [Repealed.]

Acts 1909, ch. 473, § 1; Shan., § 3473a40; Code 1932, § 6597; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-1003; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 5, effective April 17, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 53-8-101 — 53-8-117, concerned health and sanitation for establishments selling food.

53-8-103. [Repealed.]

Acts 1909, ch. 473, § 2; 1913 (1st E.S.), ch. 15, § 1; Shan., § 3473a42; mod. Code 1932, § 6599; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-1004; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 5, effective April 17, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 53-8-101 — 53-8-117, concerned health and sanitation for establishments selling food.

53-8-104. [Repealed.]

Acts 1909, ch. 473, § 3; Shan., § 3473a44; Code 1932, § 6601; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-1005; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 5, effective April 17, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 53-8-101 — 53-8-117, concerned health and sanitation for establishments selling food.

53-8-105. [Repealed.]

Acts 1909, ch. 473, § 3; Shan., § 3473a45; Code 1932, § 6602; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-1006; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 5, effective April 17, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 53-8-101 — 53-8-117, concerned health and sanitation for establishments selling food.

53-8-106. [Repealed.]

Acts 1909, ch. 473, § 4; Shan., § 3473a46; Code 1932, § 6603; Acts 1943, ch. 61, § 1; 1943, ch. 122, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 6603; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-1007; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 5, effective April 17, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 53-8-101 — 53-8-117, concerned health and sanitation for establishments selling food.

53-8-107. [Repealed.]

Acts 1909, ch. 473, § 5; Shan., § 3473a47; Code 1932, § 6604; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-1008; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 5, effective April 17, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 53-8-101 — 53-8-117, concerned health and sanitation for establishments selling food.

53-8-108. [Repealed.]

Acts 1909, ch. 473, § 5; Shan., § 3473a48; Code 1932, § 6605; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-1009; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 5, effective April 17, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 53-8-101 — 53-8-117, concerned health and sanitation for establishments selling food.

53-8-109. [Repealed.]

Acts 1909, ch. 473, § 6; Shan., § 3473a49; Code 1932, § 6606; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-1010; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 5, effective April 17, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 53-8-101 — 53-8-117, concerned health and sanitation for establishments selling food.

53-8-110. [Repealed.]

Acts 1909, ch. 473, § 6; Shan., § 3473a50; Code 1932, § 6607; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-1011; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 5, effective April 17, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 53-8-101 — 53-8-117, concerned health and sanitation for establishments selling food.

53-8-111. [Repealed.]

Acts 1909, ch. 473, § 8; Shan., § 3473a52; Code 1932, § 6609; Acts 1943, ch. 44, § 1; 1949, ch. 133, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 6609; Acts 1961, ch. 45, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-1012; Acts 2013, ch. 182, § 49; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 5, effective April 17, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 53-8-101 — 53-8-117, concerned health and sanitation for establishments selling food.

53-8-112. [Repealed.]

Acts 1909, ch. 473, § 7; Shan., § 3473a51; Code 1932, § 6608; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-1013; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 5, effective April 17, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 53-8-101 — 53-8-117, concerned health and sanitation for establishments selling food.

53-8-113. [Repealed.]

Acts 1909, ch. 473, § 9; Shan., § 3473a53; mod. Code 1932, § 6610; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 52-1014; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 5, effective April 17, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 53-8-101 — 53-8-117, concerned health and sanitation for establishments selling food.

53-8-114. [Repealed.]

Acts 1909, ch. 473, § 9; Shan., §§ 3473a54, 3473a55; mod. Code 1932, §§ 6611, 6612; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 52-1015, 52-1016; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 5, effective April 17, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 53-8-101 — 53-8-117, concerned health and sanitation for establishments selling food.

53-8-115. [Repealed.]

Acts 1909, ch. 473, § 10; 1913 (1st E.S.), ch. 15, § 2; Shan., §§ 3473a56, 3473a57, 3473a58, 3473a59, 3473a60; mod. Code 1932, §§ 6613, 6614, 6615, 6616, 6617; Acts 1979, ch. 399, § 6; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 52-1017 — 52-1021; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 5, effective April 17, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 53-8-101 — 53-8-117, concerned health and sanitation for establishments selling food.

53-8-116. [Repealed.]

Acts 1986, ch. 756, § 1; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 5, effective April 17, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 53-8-101 — 53-8-117, concerned health and sanitation for establishments selling food.

53-8-117. [Repealed.]

Acts 2007, ch. 202, § 1; 2011, ch. 387, § 1; 2012, ch. 1105, § 1; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 5, effective April 17, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 53-8-101 — 53-8-117, concerned health and sanitation for establishments selling food.